Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 86A.215 is amended to read:
86A.215. (1) An applicant for a mortgage loan originator’s license shall:
(a) Complete, at a minimum, 20 hours of an approved course of prelicensing education  that, at
a minimum, must include:
(A) Three hours devoted to federal laws and regulations;
(B) Three hours  devoted to ethics, with instruction concerning fraud, consumer protection and
fair lending; and
(C) Two hours devoted to lending standards applicable to nontraditional mortgages; [ and]
(b) Complete additional educational requirements as the Director of  the Department of
Consumer and Business Services  may establish by rule, including on topics of implicit bias,
including racial bias; and
[(b)] (c)  Pass a  qualified written test with a score of 75 percent correct or better. The test must
measure the applicant’s knowledge of:
(A) Ethics; and
(B) Federal and state laws, regulations  and rules that apply to residential mortgage loan origi-
nation, including laws, regulations and rules that concern  fraud, consumer protection, fair lending
and nontraditional mortgages.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) An approved course of prelicensing education is a course that the Nationwide Mortgage  Li-
censing System and Registry has reviewed  and for which the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing Sys-
tem and Registry has approved the contents, provider, instructional  standards and means and
methods of delivery, using reasonable standards.
(b) A qualified written test is a test that the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Reg-
istry develops and for which the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and  Registry approves the
test provider and method of test administration, using reasonable standards.
(3) The director shall accept for the purposes of  the requirements set forth in subsection (1) of
this section an approved course of prelicensing education  that an applicant completed in another
state.
Enrolled House Bill 2007 (HB 2007-B) Page 1
(4) This section does not preclude:
(a) An applicant’s employer or a subsidiary, agent  or affiliate of the employer from providing
an approved course of prelicensing education; or
(b) An approved test provider from administering  a qualified test at the business location of the
applicant’s employer or an affiliate, subsidiary or agent of the employer or at the  business location
of a person with which the employer has an  exclusive contractual arrangement related to mortgage
loan origination.
(5) An applicant may  take a qualified test four consecutive times, provided that each test ad-
ministration occurs 30 days after a previous test administration. If  the applicant fails the approved
test four consecutive times, the applicant must wait at least six months before retaking the test.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 86A.221 is amended to read:
86A.221. (1) A  licensed mortgage loan originator each year shall complete at least eight hours
of an approved course of continuing education that[ ,]:
(a) At a minimum, must include:
[(a)] (A)  Three hours devoted to federal laws and regulations;
[(b)] (B)  Two hours devoted to ethics, with instruction concerning fraud,  consumer protection
and fair lending; and
[(c)] (C) Two hours devoted to lending standards applicable to nontraditional mortgages[ .]; and
(b) May  include additional requirements as the Director of the Department of Consumer
and Business Services may establish by rule, including  on topics of implicit bias, including
racial bias.
(2) For purposes of this section, an approved course of continuing education is  a course that the
Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry has reviewed  and for which the Nationwide
Mortgage Licensing System  and Registry has approved the contents, provider, instructional stand-
ards and means and methods of delivery, using reasonable standards.
(3) This section does not preclude a licensed mortgage loan  originator’s employer or a subsid-
iary, agent or affiliate of the employer from providing an approved course of continuing education.
(4) [ The Director of the Department of  Consumer and Business Services shall accept ] For the
purposes of the requirement  set forth in subsection (1) of this section , the director shall accept
an approved course of continuing education that a licensed mortgage loan  originator completed in
another state.
(5) A licensed mortgage loan originator:
(a) May receive credit for a continuing education course only in the  year in which the licensed
mortgage loan originator takes the course, unless the director under ORS 86A.218 permits  or re-
quires the mortgage loan originator to make up a deficiency in continuing education; and
(b) May not for the purposes of meeting the  requirement set forth in subsection (1) of this sec-
tion take the same approved course of continuing  education in the same year or in any two suc-
cessive years.
(6) A licensed mortgage  loan originator who is also approved as an instructor for an approved
course of continuing education may receive two hours of credit  toward the licensed mortgage loan
originator’s own continuing  education requirement for each hour of the approved course of contin-
uing education that the licensed mortgage loan originator teaches.
SECTION 3.
The amendments to ORS 86A.215 and 86A.221 by sections 1 and 2  of this 2021
Act become operative on January 1, 2022.
SECTION 4. (1) The Joint Task Force on Addressing Racial Disparities in Home Owner-
ship is established.
(2) The task force consists of 16 members appointed as follows:
(a) The President of the Senate shall appoint two members from among  members of the
Senate;
(b) The Speaker of the House of  Representatives shall appoint two members from among
members of the House of Representatives;
Enrolled House Bill 2007 (HB 2007-B) Page 2
(c) The President of the Senate and  the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall
jointly appoint 11 members who represent the following interests:
(A) One member who represents real estate licensees in this state;
(B) One member who represents entities that originate, fund or service mortgage loans;
(C) Two members who each represent an organization with  a particular focus on serving
persons of color  that provides individuals and families counseling, education or the opportu-
nity to purchase affordable housing;
(D) Two members who  represent credit unions, banks or other financial institutions that
make mortgage loans in different geographic areas of this state;
(E) One member who represents developers of affordable housing;
(F) One member who represents a fiduciary organization administering state  moneys di-
rected to individual development accounts as defined in ORS 458.670;
(G) One member who represents nonprofit  organizations with experience in fair housing
issues; and
(H) Two members  who represent residents of this state who have suffered historic dis-
crimination or who currently lack  opportunities for homeownership because of discrimi-
nation or inadequate financial resources. The President and the Speaker shall  give
preferences to  appointing members who represent diverse geographic regions of this state;
and
(d) The Director of the Housing and  Community Services Department shall appoint one
nonvoting member to represent the department or the Oregon Housing Stability Council.
(3) The task force shall:
(a) Review the work and reports of the Task Force on Addressing Racial Disparities  in
Home Ownership;
(b) Continue, as necessary, any  of the investigation or reporting tasks initiated by the
Task Force on Addressing Racial Disparities in  Home Ownership under section 1, chapter
110, Oregon Laws 2018; and
(c) Recommend solutions, including legislation, to  eliminate discrimination and other
barriers identified by the Task Force on Addressing  Racial Disparities in Home Ownership
under section 1, chapter 110,  Oregon Laws 2018, in order to ameliorate conditions reducing
or preventing homeownership among people of color in this state.
(4) The task force may consult experts,  form subcommittees or advisory committees,
conduct field investigations, hearings and other meetings, receive testimony in any form or
format, request or require production of  documents and other evidence and otherwise take
any lawful action to carry out the purposes set forth in subsection (3) of this section.
(5) A majority of the voting members of the task force constitutes a quorum for the
transaction of business.
(6) Official  action by the task force requires the approval of a majority of the members
of the task force.
(7) The task force shall elect a legislative member of  the task force to serve as chair-
person.
(8) If  there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(9) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call  of the chairperson
or of a majority of the members of the task force.
(10) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(11) The task force shall submit a report in the manner  provided by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations  for legislation, to an interim committee of the Legislative
Assembly related to housing no later than September 15, 2022.
(12) The Legislative Policy and Research Director shall provide staff  support to the task
force.
Enrolled House Bill 2007 (HB 2007-B) Page 3
(13) Members of the task force are entitled to compensation from the Legislative As-
sembly, through  the Legislative Policy and Research Committee, and may be compensated
for actual and necessary travel and  other expenses incurred by the members in the per-
formance of official duties in the manner and amount as provided in ORS 292.495.
(14) All agencies of state government, as defined  in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of the task force’s duties and, to the  extent permitted by
laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and  advice the members of the task
force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 5. Section 4 of this 2021 Act is repealed on December 31, 2022.
SECTION 6. This 2021 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House June 17, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 22, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2007 (HB 2007-B) Page 4